Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829.06
Nebraska Nonprofit Security Grant Program Act, how cited.

Sections 81-829.06 to 81-829.11 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Nonprofit Security Grant Program Act.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 14.
July 19, 2024